apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_num.ca.dix
 <pardef n="dos_mil__num">
    <!--  <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>mil</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>mil</l>
          <r>ues<b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>mil<b/>cent</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>mil<b/>cent</l>
          <r>ues<b/>mil<b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>mil<b/>dos-cents</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>dos-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>mil<b/>dos-cents</l>
          <r>ues<b/>mil<b/>dues-centes<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>mil<b/>tres-cents</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>tres-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues<b/>mil<b/>tres-centes</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>tres-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>mil<b/>quatre-cents</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>quatre-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues<b/>mil<b/>quatre-centes</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>quatre-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>mil<b/>cinc-cents</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>cinc-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues<b/>mil<b/>cinc-centes</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>cinc-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>mil<b/>sis-cents</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>sis-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues<b/>mil<b/>sis-centes</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>sis-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>mil<b/>set-cents</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>set-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues<b/>mil<b/>set-centes</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>set-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>mil<b/>vuit-cents</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>vuit-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues<b/>mil<b/>vuit-centes</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>vuit-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>mil<b/>nou-cents</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>nou-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues<b/>mil<b/>nou-centes</l>
          <r>os<b/>mil<b/>nou-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


    </pardef>

 </pardefs>

<e lm="dos" r="RL"><i>d</i><par n="dos_mil__num"/></e>
